Florida, session 2026, SB786.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âSection 736.10081, Florida Statutes, is created 25 to read: 26 736.10081âNonjudicial settlement and discharge of a 27 trustee; disclosure; objections.â 28 (1)âA trustee who is in substantial compliance with the 29 duty to inform and account under s. 736.0813 may obtain a 30 settlement of his or her accounts and be discharged pursuant to 31 this section when either of the following occurs 6 months after 32 the trusteeâs acceptance: 33 (a)âThe trust terminates. 34 (b)âA trustee resigns or is removed from the trust. 35 (2)âA trustee seeking settlement and discharge pursuant to 36 this section must send to the trustâs qualified beneficiaries 37 and any cotrustee, and the immediate successor trustee if the 38 trust is not terminating, a trust disclosure document as defined 39 in s. 736.1008(4) which contains all of the following: 40 (a)âThe name, mailing address, telephone number, and e-mail 41 address of the trustee seeking discharge. 42 (b)âA plan of distribution which includes all of the 43 following: 44 1.âA schedule of the assets reasonably anticipated to be 45 disbursed or distributed by the trustee. 46 2.âThe amount of any debts, expenses, and taxes to be paid 47 by the trustee. 48 3.âAny reasonable reserve to be held by the trustee. 49 (c)âIf the trusteeâs duty to account has not been waived, a 50 trust accounting as defined in s. 736.1008(4) for the period for 51 which an accounting has not been previously provided to the 52 qualified beneficiaries of the trust. 53 (d)âA statement that the trust has terminated or that the 54 trustee has resigned or has been removed. 55 (e)âA notice with substantially the following language in 56 at least 12-point type: 57 58 âNOTICE: Any claim or cause of action you might have 59 against the trustee arising from any matter disclosed 60 in a trust disclosure document may be barred unless a 61 written statement objecting is received by the trustee 62 from you within 60 days after your receipt of this 63 trust disclosure document and notice. If you have 64 questions, please consult your attorney.â 65 66 (3)âThe trustee shall also send the trust disclosure 67 document described in subsection (2) to any other person whom 68 the trustee reasonably believes would be affected by the trust 69 disclosure document. The trust disclosure document and any 70 objections must be sent with the notice requirements of s. 71 736.0109, except that s. 736.0109(3) does not apply. 72 (4)âThis section does not apply if the trustee receives a 73 written objection within 60 days after sending the trust 74 disclosure document. An objection does not need to state the 75 grounds for the objection or be in any particular form. 76 (5)âIf the trustee does not receive a timely written 77 objection, the trustee is discharged upon completion of all 78 distributions or transfers in accordance with the plan of 79 distribution and is discharged from all liability and claims 80 arising from any matter adequately disclosed in the trust 81 disclosure document, including any claim that the trustee failed 82 to inform and account pursuant to s. 736.0813, with the same 83 effect as if the court had entered a final order approving that 84 act or omission. 85 (6)âA waiver of the right to object pursuant to this 86 section is treated as the expiration of the 60-day period 87 without objection. 88 (7)âThis section is in addition to, and not a replacement 89 of, rights of a trustee to otherwise settle the trusteeâs 90 accounts. 91 Section 2.âThis act applies to all trusts that are 92 irrevocable or become irrevocable on or after the effective date 93 of this act. 94 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.